Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-213
Election commissioner; oath of office; bond.

Before entering upon his or her duties, the election commissioner shall take and subscribe an oath in the form provided in section 11-101.01 and shall give bond in the sum of ten thousand dollars conditioned on the faithful and honest performance of the duties of the office and the care and preservation of the property of the office within thirty days after appointment as provided in section 11-105. When the election commissioner is appointed by the Governor, the bond shall be given to the State of Nebraska, approved by the Governor, and filed with the Secretary of State. When the election commissioner is appointed by the county board, the bond shall be given to, approved by, and filed with the county board.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 33.